Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.580

Emergency purchase of materials or work by contract.

When the managing director or a designee determines in writing that an emergency endangers the public safety or threatens property damage or that serious financial injury would result if materials, supplies, equipment, or work are not obtained by a certain time, and they cannot be contracted for by that time by means of sealed bids, the managing director or a designee may purchase materials, equipment, or supplies or may order work by contract in any amount necessary, after having taken precautions to secure a responsive proposal at the lowest price practicable under the circumstances.

For the purposes of this section the term "serious financial injury" means that the costs attributable to the delay caused by contracting by sealed bids exceed the cost of materials, supplies, equipment, or work to be obtained.

[ 1987 c 376 s 5.]